Illinois, session 104th, HB2512.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Accountability in Psychotropic Drug Prescriptions for Children 6Under Medicaid Act. 7    Section 5. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 8finds the following:9        (1) In 2023, Illinois' Medicaid program statistics 10    showed 96,841 children and adolescents aged 0-17 being 11    prescribed psychotropic drugs, including 7,227 children 12    aged 0-5.13        (2) The administration of nearly every psychotropic 14    drug to children aged 0-5 is off-label, meaning the drugs 15    are being prescribed for age groups not approved by the 16    U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA).17        (3) Psychotropic drugs, including stimulants, 18    antidepressants, antipsychotics, and other behavioral 19    drugs, are being prescribed to children using Medicaid 20    funding and are documented by the FDA to include severe 21    side effects, including, but not limited to, addiction, 22    suicidal ideation, aggression, hallucinations, 23    cardiovascular events, stunted growth, and developmental   HB2512- 2 -LRB104 10052 KTG 20123 b1    concerns.2        (4) Parents and caregivers are frequently not informed 3    of the FDA-documented risks associated with the 4    psychotropics being prescribed, including the pediatric 5    risks.6        (5) Section 208.20 of Title 21 of the United States 7    Code of Federal Regulations (CFR) establishes the 8    requirement for FDA Medication Guides to provide easily 9    understandable information about the risks and side 10    effects of prescription drugs for the average consumer, 11    including parents and caregivers. According to federal 12    regulations, Medication Guides must:13            (A) Detail "the particular serious and significant 14        public health concern that has created the need for 15        the Medication Guide". 16            (B) Note any known "pediatric risks".17            (C) Include the risk of "patients developing 18        dependence on the drug product".19            (D) Use a font size no smaller than 10-point.20            (E) Be written in "nontechnical, understandable 21        language". 22            (F) "Not be promotional in tone or content". 23        (6) To effectively monitor the effects of psychotropic 24    drugs prescribed to children and adolescents, particularly 25    the FDA-cited "pediatric effects", parents and caregivers 26    must be given a hard copy of the FDA Medication Guide for   HB2512- 3 -LRB104 10052 KTG 20123 b1    the psychotropic drug being prescribed.2        (7) Medicaid is a state and federally funded program 3    that provides essential healthcare services to vulnerable 4    populations, including children and adolescents. It should 5    be required to distribute the FDA Medication Guides to 6    ensure recipients and their guardians are fully informed 7    of the risks and potential adverse effects of psychotropic 8    medications, thereby supporting informed consent and 9    promoting patient safety.10        (8) A reliable system for parents and caregivers to 11    report adverse drug reactions to psychotropic drugs is 12    essential to help Medicaid agencies and legislators 13    monitor and assess the frequency, severity, and impact of 14    such reactions within the public sector.15        (9) The absence of an accessible, Medicaid-funded 16    reporting mechanism for drug side effects limits the 17    ability to identify and address these risks effectively, 18    compromising the safety of children and adolescents.19        (10) Medicaid is the primary payer for psychotropic 20    medications prescribed to children and adolescents in the 21    public sector, including for off-label use in children as 22    young as 0-5 years, making it directly responsible for 23    ensuring the safety and monitoring of these prescriptions.24        (11) Adverse drug reactions (ADRs) to psychotropic 25    medications can have significant physical, psychological, 26    and developmental impacts on children, requiring timely   HB2512- 4 -LRB104 10052 KTG 20123 b1    identification and response to mitigate harm.2        (12) The establishment of an online ADR reporting 3    system would enable the State's Medicaid program to 4    fulfill its duty of care by providing a mechanism to 5    collect critical safety data, support evidence-based 6    decision-making, and comply with its responsibility to 7    protect public health.8        (13) Funding this reporting system aligns with the 9    State's Medicaid program's obligations under federal law 10    to monitor and improve the quality of care provided to its 11    beneficiaries, especially vulnerable pediatric 12    populations, and would facilitate oversight and 13    accountability for the use of public funds in prescribing 14    psychotropic medications.15        (14) The provisions of this Act are established to 16    address these findings and enhance oversight, informed 17    consent, and accountability in psychotropic drug 18    prescriptions for children under the State's Medicaid 19    program. 20    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:21    "Adverse drug reaction" or "ADR" means any unintended 22harmful reaction to a psychotropic drug.23    "Department" means the Department of Healthcare and Family 24Services.25    "FDA Medication Guides" means handouts accompanying   HB2512- 5 -LRB104 10052 KTG 20123 b1certain prescription medications with significant safety 2concerns, approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration 3(FDA), to inform patients and caregivers about risks, side 4effects, and proper usage.5    "Medical care providers" means any licensed health 6professionals authorized to prescribe medication under the 7State's Medicaid program.8    "Online Reporting System" means a web-based platform 9through which Medicaid beneficiaries or their guardians can 10report ADRs related to psychotropic drugs.11    "Psychotropic drugs" means medications that affect the 12mind, emotions, or behavior, including, but not limited to, 13stimulants, antidepressants, antipsychotics, and other 14behavioral drugs, authorized or funded under the State's 15Medicaid program. 16    Section 15. Informed consent requirements. 17    (a) Distribution of FDA Medication Guides:18        (1) Medical care providers prescribing psychotropic 19    drugs to children under the State's Medicaid program must 20    provide FDA Medication Guides to parents or legal 21    guardians before issuing a prescription.22        (2) The Medication Guides must be printed and reviewed 23    with the parent or legal guardian, explaining:24            (A) FDA-identified risks of the medication, 25        including pediatric-specific warnings.  HB2512- 6 -LRB104 10052 KTG 20123 b1            (B) Signs of potential side effects and adverse 2        drug reactions detailed in the Medication Guide.3    (b) Written and signed informed consent. Before 4prescribing a psychotropic drug, written informed consent must 5be obtained from the parent or legal guardian. The consent 6must:7        (1) Be signed by the parent or legal guardian, 8    confirming that they:9            (A) Have received and reviewed the FDA Medication 10        Guide.11            (B) Understand the associated risks and side 12        effects.13        (2) Be kept on file by the medical care provider, with 14    a copy provided to the parent or legal guardian. 15    Section 20. Medicaid establishment of an Adverse Drug 16Reaction (ADR) Online Reporting System. 17    (a) Adverse drug reaction online reporting system. The 18Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall, within 12 19months after the effective date of this Act, develop and 20maintain a secure online reporting system for adverse drug 21reactions related to psychotropic drugs prescribed to children 22and adolescents. The system shall include the below free-text 23fields and drop-down menus for categorizing the type of drug, 24the nature of the adverse reaction, and the severity level. 25These features shall streamline the reporting process by   HB2512- 7 -LRB104 10052 KTG 20123 b1simplifying user input, ensuring faster processing, and 2reducing errors for a secure online system, which will allow 3the Department of Healthcare and Family Services to provide 4legislators with summaries of the adverse reactions being 5reported.6        (1) Name of Patient (free-text field)7        (required)8        (2) Age of Patient (drop-down menu)9        (required)10        (3) Class of Psychotropic Drug (drop-down menu)11        (optional to skip if the reporter doesn't know the 12    category)13            (A) Antidepressants.14            (B) Antipsychotics.15            (C) Mood Stabilizers.16            (D) Stimulants.17            (E) Anti-anxiety drugs and Sedatives.18            (F) Hypnotics.19        (4) Name of Drug (free-text field)20        (required)21        (5) Adverse Reaction Category (drop-down menu)22        (required)23            (A) Physical Reaction:24                (i) Gastrointestinal issues (nausea, vomiting, 25            diarrhea, constipation).26                (ii) Neurological symptoms (dizziness,   HB2512- 8 -LRB104 10052 KTG 20123 b1            headaches, seizures, tremors).2                (iii) Cardiovascular symptoms (increased heart 3            rate, blood pressure changes).4                (iv) Endocrine/metabolic effects (weight 5            changes, hormonal imbalances).6                (v) Allergic reactions (rash, hives, 7            anaphylaxis).8            (B) Psychological Reaction:9                (i) Mood changes (irritability, depression, 10            euphoria).11                (ii) Anxiety or panic attacks.12                (iii) Hallucinations or delusions.13                (iv) Agitation or restlessness.14                (v) Suicidal thoughts or behaviors.15            (C) Behavioral Reaction:16                (i) Sleep disturbances (insomnia, 17            hypersomnia).18                (ii) Increased aggression or hostility.19                (iii) Manic behaviors.20                (iv) Cognitive impairments (memory loss, 21            confusion).22                (v) Self-harm.23                (vi) Disassociation.24            (D) Other (free-text field)25        (6) Severity level (drop-down menu)26        (required)  HB2512- 9 -LRB104 10052 KTG 20123 b1            (A) Mild.2            (B) Moderate.3            (C) Severe.4        (7) Name of Person Reporting (free-text field)5        (required)6        (8) Relation of Person Reporting (drop-down menu)7        (required)8            (A) Parent.9            (B) Foster Parent.10            (C) Relative.11            (D) Legal Guardian.12            (E) Case Worker.13            (F) Social Worker.14            (G) Direct Care Staff.15            (H) Other (free-text field).16        (9) Email Address of Person Reporting (free-text 17    field)18        (optional, to facilitate any needed follow-up)19        (10) Phone Number of Person Reporting (free-text 20    field)21        (optional, to facilitate any needed follow-up)22    (b) Adverse drug reaction reporting requirements. The 23Department shall compile and submit quarterly reports 24summarizing ADR data related to psychotropic drugs 25administered to children and adolescents to the legislative 26committees overseeing Medicaid funding. These reports shall   HB2512- 10 -LRB104 10052 KTG 20123 b1include:2        (1) The number of ADRs reported broken down by age 3    group.4        (2) The severity level of ADRs reported.5        (3) A breakdown of ADRs by Adverse Reaction Category 6    and severity of reactions detailing the number of 7    incidents for each category of reaction and severity.8    (c) Legislative oversight. Legislative committees shall 9review ADR reports related to psychotropic drugs during 10Medicaid budget hearings and program reviews and may recommend 11actions to improve medication safety.12    (d) Implementation. The Department shall allocate funds to 13establish and maintain the ADR online reporting system 14specifically for psychotropic drugs and may seek additional 15funding as needed. 16    Section 25. Penalties for medical care provider 17noncompliance with medication guide distribution. Suspension 18of Medicaid reimbursement. Medical care providers failing to 19comply with the signed informed consent form on the Medication 20Guide may face penalties, including suspension of Medicaid 21reimbursements. 22    Section 30. Penalty for Department noncompliance. If the 23Department fails to submit the required quarterly ADR reports 24to the appropriate legislative committees within the specified   HB2512- 11 -LRB104 10052 KTG 20123 b1timeframe, the following penalties shall apply:2        (1) Monetary penalty. The Department shall incur a 3    monetary fine for each quarter of noncompliance, with the 4    fine amount increasing for subsequent violations. The fine 5    shall be deposited into the Medicaid Oversight and Safety 6    Measures Fund, a special fund created in the State 7    treasury for the sole purpose of improving Medicaid 8    oversight and safety measures.9        (2) Reduction in Medicaid funding. The State's 10    Medicaid program shall face a reduction in its funding 11    allocation for the following fiscal quarter until full 12    compliance is demonstrated, including the timely 13    submission of all required ADR reports.14        (3) Oversight review. The Governor or relevant State 15    oversight body shall initiate a formal review of the 16    Department's operations and reporting procedures, which 17    may result in further corrective actions, including the 18    appointment of an external auditor to ensure the accurate 19    and timely reporting of ADR data. 20    Section 35. Transparency and accountability reports. The 21Department must submit annual reports to the General Assembly 22summarizing implementation efforts, compliance statistics, and 23the impact of this Act, including fiscal analysis and health 24outcomes.   HB2512- 12 -LRB104 10052 KTG 20123 b1    Section 45. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 2Section 5.1030 as follows: 3    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)4    Sec. 5.1030. The Medicaid Oversight and Safety Measures 5Fund.